local/incubator/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="k/ar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erent</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/añvad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>añvad</l>
          <r>añvad<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eñved</l>
          <r>añvad<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/azeg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>azeg</l>
          <r>azeg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ezekenned</l>
          <r>azeg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="b/azh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>azh</l>
          <r>azh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>izhier</l>
          <r>azh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/gar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gar</l>
          <r>gar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>divhar</l>
          <r>gar<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pl/anken__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anken</l>
          <r>anken<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enk</l>
          <r>anken<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aotrou__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nez</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sae__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>où</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="oan__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="g/avr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avr</l>
          <r>avr<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivri</l>
          <r>avr<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="goul/ou__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>ou<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eier</l>
          <r>ou<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/atezh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atezh</l>
          <r>atezh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itizhien</l>
          <r>atezh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/anac’h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anac’h</l>
          <r>anac’h<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enec’h</l>
          <r>anac’h<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kel/où__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>où</l>
          <r>où<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eier</l>
          <r>où<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gw/astell__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>astell</l>
          <r>astell<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>estell</l>
          <r>astell<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/brec’h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>brec’h</l>
          <r>brec’h<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>divrec’h</l>
          <r>brec’h<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/en__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ud</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gwazhie/nn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nn</l>
          <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>nn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ejen__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejen</l>
          <r>ejen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oc’hen</l>
          <r>ejen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/aen__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aen</l>
          <r>aen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ein</l>
          <r>aen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="breu/r__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>deur</l>
          <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gol/o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eier</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="esk/ob__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ob</l>
          <r>ob<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibien</l>
          <r>ob<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/alz__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alz</l>
          <r>alz<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilzier</l>
          <r>alz<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="b/enveg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enveg</l>
          <r>enveg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>invioù</l>
          <r>enveg<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/orn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orn</l>
          <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aouarn</l>
          <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/glin__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>glin</l>
          <r>glin<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>daoulin</l>
          <r>glin<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="laer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="aotrou"><i>aotrou</i><par n="aotrou__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bazh"><par n="initial-b"/><i/><par n="b/azh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="benveg"><par n="initial-b"/><i/><par n="b/enveg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bragoù"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rag</i><par n="kel/où__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brec’h"><i/><par n="/brec’h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="breur"><par n="initial-b"/><i>reu</i><par n="breu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dañvad"><par n="initial-d"/><i/><par n="d/añvad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="den"><par n="initial-d"/><i/><par n="d/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dorn"><par n="initial-d"/><i/><par n="d/orn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ejen"><i/><par n="/ejen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eskob"><i>esk</i><par n="esk/ob__n"/></e>
    <e lm="falz"><i>f</i><par n="f/alz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gar"><i/><par n="/gar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gavr"><par n="initial-g"/><i/><par n="g/avr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glin"><i/><par n="/glin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="golo"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ol</i><par n="gol/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="goulou"><par n="initial-g"/><i>oul</i><par n="goul/ou__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwastell"><par n="initial-gw"/><i/><par n="gw/astell__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwazhienn"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>azhie</i><par n="gwazhie/nn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kannad"><i>kannad</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kar"><i>k</i><par n="k/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kazeg"><i>k</i><par n="k/azeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kegin"><i>kegin</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keloù"><i>kel</i><par n="kel/où__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laer"><i>laer</i><par n="laer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="louzoù"><i>louz</i><par n="kel/où__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maen"><par n="initial-m"/><i/><par n="m/aen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="manac’h"><par n="initial-m"/><i/><par n="m/anac’h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="matezh"><par n="initial-m"/><i/><par n="m/atezh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="medisin"><par n="initial-m"/><i>edisin</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="planken"><par n="initial-p"/><i>l</i><par n="pl/anken__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pried"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ried</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ramz"><i>ramz</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alvokad"><i>alvokad</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amezegiezh"><i>amezegiezh</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arvestadeg"><i>arvestadeg</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baron"><par n="initial-b"/><i>aron</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bevaenn"><par n="initial-b"/><i>evaenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brikenn"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rikenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="darn"><par n="initial-d"/><i>arn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diplomat"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iplomat</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dornell"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ornell</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="er"><i>er</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="faltazi"><i>faltazi</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frezenn"><i>frezenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gorillh"><par n="initial-g"/><i>orillh</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gourenadeg"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ourenadeg</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hilienn"><i>hilienn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jandarm"><i>jandarm</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karedig"><par n="initial-k"/><i>aredig</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kastizadenn"><par n="initial-k"/><i>astizadenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konikl"><par n="initial-k"/><i>onikl</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krakperoked"><par n="initial-k"/><i>rakperoked</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kunujenn"><par n="initial-k"/><i>unujenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leon"><i>leon</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ment"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ent</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mignon"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ignon</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="papigod"><par n="initial-p"/><i>apigod</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pichon"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ichon</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plegenn"><par n="initial-p"/><i>legenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="relijiuz"><i>relijiuz</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seintez"><i>seintez</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stlejvil"><i>stlejvil</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tell"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ell</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
